New York, session 2025-2026, S1686.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The labor law is amended by adding a new section 218-c to 2 read as follows: 3 § 218-c. Prohibition of certain activities in extreme temperatures. 1. 4 As used in this section the following terms shall have the following 5 meanings: 6 (a) "Retail business" means any entity that is engaged primarily in 7 the sale of consumer goods at one or more stores within the state. For 8 the purposes of this definition, "consumer goods" means products that 9 are primarily for personal, household, or family purposes, including but 10 not limited to appliances, clothing, electronics, groceries, and house- 11 hold items. 12 (b) "Extreme temperature" shall mean a measured outdoor temperature of 13 ninety degrees Fahrenheit and above. 14 (c) "Human billboard" shall mean holding or wearing a sign or partic- 15 ular clothing outside of a retail business for the purposes of adver- 16 tisement. 17 2. No retail business shall direct an employee to engage in human 18 billboard activities during extreme temperatures. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01687-01-5